Alaska, session 34, HB281.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF ALASKA: 03 * Section 1. AS 45.45 is amended by adding a new section to read: 04 Sec. 45.45.940. Cash transaction rounding. (a) When processing a cash 05 transaction, a seller that rounds cash transactions to the nearest five cents shall 06 determine the total price of the transaction by first summing the price of the goods and 07 services being purchased, including discounts, then applying applicable sales or other 08 taxes, and then, when necessary to obtain a total divisible by five cents, rounding as 09 follows: 10 (1) if the total ends in one cent, two cents, six cents, or seven cents, the 11 total is rounded down to the nearest amount divisible by five cents; 12 (2) if the total ends in three cents, four cents, eight cents, or nine cents, 13 the total is rounded up to the nearest amount divisible by five cents. 14 (b) This section does not apply to transactions for which payment is made by 15 electronic funds transfer, money order, credit card, debit card, electronic payment, or 01 other similar payment method. 02 (c) A tax imposed by the state or a local government does not apply to a gain 03 or loss resulting from rounding. 04 (d) In this section, "seller" means a person who engages in the business of 05 selling, contracting for the sale of, or arranging for the sale of goods or services. Welcome toThe Alaska State Legislature This web site is the place to track bills, locate and contact your legislators, and access committee information. Questions? Try our help wizard or call 907-465-4648. SMS Bill Tracking Text a bill number (ex: HB1) to 559-245-2529 to enroll in text alerts. You will receive an enrollment confirmation and instructions on how to stop receiving the alerts.